src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON SYSTIEBMA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ebma/-iebma with long and short compound-form. -em in NOR and SWE. See comments about the -ie/-e dialtags in ALFABIEHTTA. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.
               +CmpNP/Pref:em%>      R                    ; !Short cmp
           +Use/NG+Area/SE:ebma%>    N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
           +Use/NG+Area/SE:ebma%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
           +Use/NG+Area/SE:ebma»     DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
           +Use/NG+Area/SE:ebma»     DenominalAdjsV1      ;
           +Use/NG+Area/SE:ebma»     DenominalAdjsV2      ;
 +Use/NG+Area/SE+Cmp/SgNom:ebma%>    R                    ;
 +Use/NG+Area/SE+Cmp/SgGen:ema%>     R                    ;
 +Use/NG+Area/SE+Cmp/PlGen:ema%>j    R                    ;
                  +Area/NO:iebma%>   N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
                  +Area/NO:iebma%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
                  +Area/NO:iebma»    DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
                  +Area/NO:iebma»    DenominalAdjsV1      ;
                  +Area/NO:iebma»    DenominalAdjsV2      ;
        +Area/NO+Cmp/SgNom:iebma%>   R                    ;
        +Area/NO+Cmp/SgGen:iema%>    R                    ;
        +Area/NO+Cmp/PlGen:iema%>j   R                    ;
                 +Err/Orth:em        A_CMP_INFL           ; ! makes old "systema"
        

!!€gt-norm: vokalsystiebma # Even-syllable test
!!€ vokalsystebma:                 vokalsystiebma+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ vokalsystiebma:                vokalsystiebma+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ vokalsystiemas:                vokalsystiebma+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ vokalsystemas:                 vokalsystiebma+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON AGRONÅVMMÅ
 +N+OLang/NOB: AGRONÅVMMÅ_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON AGRONÅVMMÅ_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -åvmma with long and short compound-form. The old stadarization form  -oma that does not follow lulesami rules is sub taged.
  +Cmp/SgNom:åvmmå%>   R                    ;
 +CmpNP/Pref:om%>      R                    ;
            :åvmmå%>   N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
            :åvmmå%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
            :åvmmå»    DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
            :åvmmå»    DenominalAdjsV1      ;
            :åvmmå»    DenominalAdjsV2      ;
  +Cmp/SgGen:åvmå%>    R                    ;
  +Cmp/PlGen:åvmå%>j   R                    ;
   +Err/Orth:om        A_CMP_INFL           ; ! To get the form found in dictioneries "agronoma"
   

!!€gt-norm: agronåvmmå # Even-syllable test
!!€ agronåvmmå:                 agronåvmmå+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ agronåvmås:                 agronåvmmå+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON FANATISSMA
 +N+OLang/NOB: FANATISSMA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON FANATISSMA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ssma with long and short compound-form.
                 +Cmp/SgNom:ssma%>   R                    ;
 +CmpNP/Pref+Use/NG+Area/SE:sm%>     R                    ;
        +CmpNP/Pref+Area/NO:sme%>    R                    ;
                           :ssma%>   N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
                           :ssma%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
                           :ssma»    DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
                           :ssma»    DenominalAdjsV1      ;
                           :ssma»    DenominalAdjsV2      ;
                 +Cmp/SgGen:sma%>    R                    ;
                 +Cmp/PlGen:sma%>j   R                    ;
                  +Err/Orth:sm         A_CMP_INFL         ; ! makes old fanatisma

!!€gt-norm: kabbalissma # Even-syllable test
!!€ kabbalissma:                 kabbalissma+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ kabbalismas:                 kabbalissma+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON ORGÁDNA
 +N+OLang/NOB: ORGÁDNA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON ORGÁDNA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ádna with long and short compound-form
  +Cmp/SgNom:ádna%>   R                    ;
 +CmpNP/Pref:an%>     R                    ;
            :ádna%>   N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
            :ádna%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
            :ádna»    DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
            :ádna»    DenominalAdjsV1      ;
            :ádna»    DenominalAdjsV2      ;
  +Cmp/SgGen:ána%>    R                    ;
  +Cmp/PlGen:ána%>j   R                    ;
    +Err/Orth:án      A_CMP_INFL           ; ! makes old orgána
    +Err/Orth:an      A_CMP_INFL           ; ! makes old organa
  

!!€gt-norm: guovllopládna # Even-syllable test
!!€ guovllopládna:                 guovllopládna+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ guovlloplánav:                 guovllopládna+N+Sg+Acc

LEXICON HYDROGIEDNA
 +N+OLang/NOB: HYDROGIEDNA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON HYDROGIEDNA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -iedna in NOR and -edna in SWE. Both long and short compound-form. Norwegian/swedish -en. The old standardization form -ena, without cg, is subtaged. See comments about the -ie/-e dialtags in ALFABIEHTTA.
               +CmpNP/Pref:en%>      R                    ; !Short cmp "hydrogenbummba"
                  +Area/NO:iedna%>   N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
                  +Area/NO:iedna%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
                  +Area/NO:iedna»    DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
                  +Area/NO:iedna»    DenominalAdjsV1      ;
                  +Area/NO:iedna»    DenominalAdjsV2      ;
        +Area/NO+Cmp/SgNom:iedna%>   R                    ;
        +Area/NO+Cmp/SgGen:iedna%>   R                    ;
        +Area/NO+Cmp/PlGen:iedna%>j  R                    ;
           +Use/NG+Area/SE:edna%>    N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
           +Use/NG+Area/SE:edna%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
           +Use/NG+Area/SE:edna»     DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
           +Use/NG+Area/SE:edna»     DenominalAdjsV1      ;
           +Use/NG+Area/SE:edna»     DenominalAdjsV2      ;
 +Use/NG+Area/SE+Cmp/SgNom:edna%>    R                    ;
 +Use/NG+Area/SE+Cmp/SgGen:edna%>    R                    ;
 +Use/NG+Area/SE+Cmp/PlGen:edna%>j   R                    ;
                 +Err/Orth:en%>      A_CMP_INFL           ; !makes the old "hydrogena"
                 
                 

LEXICON BENSIJNNA !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ijnna with long and short compound-form
 +N+OLang/NOB: BENSIJNNA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON BENSIJNNA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ijnna with long and short compound-form. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.
  +Cmp/SgNom:ijnna%>   R                    ;
 +CmpNP/Pref:in%>      R                    ;
            :ijnna%>   N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
            :ijnna%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
            :ijnna»    DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
            :ijnna»    DenominalAdjsV1      ;
            :ijnna»    DenominalAdjsV2      ;
  +Cmp/SgGen:ijna%>    R                    ;
  +Cmp/PlGen:ijna%>j   R                    ;
   +Err/Orth:in        A_CMP_INFL           ; ! makes old bensina


!!€gt-norm: tamburijnna # Even-syllable test
!!€ tamburijnna:                 tamburijnna+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ tamburijnas:                 tamburijnna+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON MASJIJNNA
 +N+OLang/NOB: MASJIJNNA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON MASJIJNNA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -sjijnna with long and short compound-form: -SKIN
  +Cmp/SgNom:sjijnna%>   R                    ;
 +CmpNP/Pref:skin%>      R                    ;
            :sjijnna%>   N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
            :sjijnna%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
            :sjijnna»    DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
            :sjijnna»    DenominalAdjsV1      ;
            :sjijnna»    DenominalAdjsV2      ;
  +Cmp/SgGen:sjijna%>    R                    ;
  +Cmp/PlGen:sjijna%>j   R                    ;
   +Err/Orth:skin        A_CMP_INFL           ; ! makes old maskina


!!€gt-norm: bivtasmasjijnna # Even-syllable test
!!€ bivtasmasjijnna:                 bivtasmasjijnna+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ bivtasmasjijnas:                 bivtasmasjijnna+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON TELEFÅVNNÅ
 +N+OLang/NOB: TELEFÅVNNÅ_CMP_INFL ;
