src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx
aksiåvmmå+Sem/Rule:aksi^ AGRONÅVMMÅ ; ! GG 
anatåvmmå+Sem/Cat:anat AGRONÅVMMÅ ;
antitoksijnna+Sem/Body:anti#toks BENSIJNNA ;
arsiedna+Sem/Dummytag:ars HYDROGIEDNA ;
atåvmmå+Sem/Part:at AGRONÅVMMÅ ;
axiåvmmå+Area/SE+Sem/Ideol:axi^ AGRONÅVMMÅ ; ! GG
baviádna+Area/NO+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:bavi^ ORGÁDNA ; ! 
behaviorissma+Sem/Ideol:behavi^ori FANATISSMA ; ! 
bensiedna+Sem/Dummytag:bens HYDROGIEDNA ;
bállemmasjijnna+Err/Orth+Sem/Veh:bállem#má MASJIJNNA ;
bállemmasjijnna+Sem/Veh:bállem#ma MASJIJNNA ;
civilagronåvmmå+Area/SE+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:civil#agron AGRONÅVMMÅ ;
dekstrijnna+Sem/Cat:dekstr BENSIJNNA ;
diakråvnnå+Sem/Domain:dia^kr TELEFÅVNNÅ ;
doajmmapládna+Sem/Prod-cogn:doajmma#pl ORGÁDNA ; ! 
dáhtámasjijnna+Err/Orth+Sem/Obj-el:dáhtá#má MASJIJNNA ;
dáhtámasjijnna+Sem/Obj-el:dáhtá#ma MASJIJNNA ;
ednamvuobddemorgádna+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:ednam#vuobddem#org ORGÁDNA ;
ekstremissma+Sem/Ideol:ekstremi FANATISSMA ; ! GG 
fiolijnna+Sem/Tool-music:fi^ol BENSIJNNA ;
galvanissma+Sem/Domain:galvani FANATISSMA ;
giellaorgádna+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:giella#org ORGÁDNA ;
glykogiedna+Sem/Substnc:glykog HYDROGIEDNA ;
goarrommasjijnna+Sem/Obj-el:goarrom#ma MASJIJNNA ;
grammofåvnnå+Sem/Obj-el:grammof TELEFÅVNNÅ ;
gratijnna+Sem/Dummytag:grat BENSIJNNA ;
gåjkkådimmasjijnna+Sem/Obj-el:gåjkkådim#ma MASJIJNNA ;
halogiedna+Sem/Cat:halog HYDROGIEDNA ;
háldadimorgádna+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:háldadim#org ORGÁDNA ;
idiåvmmå+Sem/Domain:idi^ AGRONÅVMMÅ ;
intellektualissma+Sem/Ideol:intellektu^ali FANATISSMA ; ! 
kalcedåvnnå+Area/SE+Sem/Mat:kalced TELEFÅVNNÅ ; ! Kalcedon är ett mineral som består av tät, kryptokristallin kiseldioxid
kanijnna+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:kan BENSIJNNA ;
kapelládna+Area/NO+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:kapell ORGÁDNA ; ! NOR Kapellan 
karotiedna+Sem/Mat:karot HYDROGIEDNA ;
klementijnna+Sem/Fruit:klement BENSIJNNA ;
kopimasjijnna+Sem/Dummytag:kopi#ma MASJIJNNA ;
korporativissma+Sem/Dummytag:korporativi FANATISSMA ;
legiåvnnå+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:legi^ TELEFÅVNNÅ ; ! 
lihttemasjijnna+Sem/Obj-el:lihtte#ma MASJIJNNA ;
lupijnna+Sem/Dummytag:lup BENSIJNNA ;
masjijnna+Sem/Obj-el:ma MASJIJNNA ; ! 
melåvnnå+Sem/Fruit:mel TELEFÅVNNÅ ; ! 
membrádna+Sem/Dummytag:membr ORGÁDNA ;
meskalijnna+Sem/Dummytag:meskal BENSIJNNA ;
modernissma+Sem/Ideol:moderni FANATISSMA ; ! 
molybdiedna+Sem/Dummytag:molybd HYDROGIEDNA ;
monåvmmå+Sem/Geom:mon AGRONÅVMMÅ ;
naftaliedna+Sem/Dummytag:naftal HYDROGIEDNA ;
nominalissma+Sem/Domain:nominali FANATISSMA ;
nylåvnnå+Sem/Mat:nyl TELEFÅVNNÅ ;
oksygiedna+Sem/Substnc:oksyg HYDROGIEDNA ; !
persåvnnå+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:pers TELEFÅVNNÅ ; ! 
pigskijnna+Sem/Dummytag:pig#sk BENSIJNNA ;
plutonissma+Sem/Domain:plutoni FANATISSMA ;
prosjæktapládna+Sem/Prod-cogn:prosjækta#pl ORGÁDNA ;
revmatissma+Sem/Dummytag:revmati FANATISSMA ;
rádåvnnå+Sem/Substnc:rád TELEFÅVNNÅ ;
sarkåvmmå+Sem/State-sick:sark AGRONÅVMMÅ ;
seliedna+Sem/Substnc:sel HYDROGIEDNA ; ! 
sivijllaøkonåvmmå+Area/SE+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:sivijlla#ekon AGRONÅVMMÅ ; ! GG
siviløkonåvmmå+Area/SE+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:civil#ekon AGRONÅVMMÅ ; ! 
sjiervvehormåvnnå+Sem/Dummytag:sjiervve#horm TELEFÅVNNÅ ;
sjtávttjaorgádna+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:sjtávttja#org ORGÁDNA ;
solipsissma+Sem/Dummytag:solipsi FANATISSMA ;
stearijnna+Sem/Substnc:ste^ar BENSIJNNA ;
syndråvmmå+Sem/State-sick:syn^dr AGRONÅVMMÅ ;
syrijnna+Area/SE+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+Sem/Prod-audio:syr HYDROGIEDNA ; ! SWE Syren, NOR Syrin 
sádjotjuohppammasjijnna+Sem/Obj-el:sádjo#tjuohppam#ma MASJIJNNA ;
telefåvnnå+Sem/Obj-el:telef TELEFÅVNNÅ ; ! 
timiádna+Area/SE+Sem/Dummytag:timj ORGÁDNA ;
tradisjonalissma+Sem/Ideol:tradisjonali FANATISSMA ; ! GG 
turbijnna+Sem/Dummytag:turb BENSIJNNA ;
vuojŋŋadimmasjijnna+Sem/Obj-el:vuojŋŋadim#ma MASJIJNNA ;
xantåvmmå+Sem/Body:xant AGRONÅVMMÅ ;
åhpadimpládna+Sem/Prod-cogn:åhpadim#pl ORGÁDNA ;
østrogiedna+Area/NO+Sem/Dummytag:østrog HYDROGIEDNA ;
